Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-248
Plan of exchange; act, how cited.

Sections 44-248 to 44-255 shall be known and may be cited as the Insurance Company Plan of Exchange Act.

Laws 1973, LB 296, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 44-133.01;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 23.